Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska15-117
Annexed cities and villages; actions pending; claims; claimants' rights.

All actions at law or in equity pending in any court in favor of or against any city of the second class or village thus consolidated with or annexed by such city of the primary class at the time such consolidation or annexation takes effect, shall be prosecuted by or defended by such city of the primary class as the case may be, and all rights of action existing against any city of the second class or village consolidated with or annexed by such city of the primary class at the time of such consolidation or annexation or accruing thereafter on account of any transaction had with or under any law or ordinance of such city of the second class or village, may be prosecuted against such city of the primary class as consolidated.

Laws 1921, c. 202, § 7, p. 732;

C.S.1922, § 3796;

C.S.1929, § 15-117;

R.S.1943, § 15-117;

Laws 1965, c. 43, § 5, p. 240.

Right of action on account of injuries received, due to negligence of municipality prior to consolidation with city of Lincoln, could be prosecuted after consolidation against latter city. Enyeart v. City of Lincoln, 136 Neb. 146, 285 N.W. 314 (1939).